Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.310

Authority to agents of commission to inspect.

Agents of the commission, upon specific written authorization signed by the chair or secretary-manager thereof, shall have the right to inspect the premises, books, records, documents, and all other instruments of any carrier, railroad, truck, boat, grower, handler, dealer, and processor for the purpose of enforcing this chapter and collecting the assessments levied hereunder.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6046; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.310. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 32; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-41.]